Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-548
County airport authority board; members; terms; qualifications.

Each airport authority board created pursuant to sections 3-601 to 3-622 shall consist of five members. Except for members initially appointed pursuant to section 3-611, members shall serve for terms of six years and shall be nominated and elected in the manner provided by law for election of nonpartisan officers of the county. Two members shall be elected at the first general election after creation of the authority, two members at the second general election after creation of the authority, and one member at the third general election after the creation of the authority. The members shall meet the qualifications found in section 3-611.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 144.